nb: Monteringstype for sete: Bunnbraketter; Inkluderer glidere/skinner; Krever gjenbruk av OEM-skinner; Sidebraketter; Universelle skinner; Kjøretøyspesifikt boltmønster; Annet
es: Tipo de montaje del asiento: Soportes de montaje inferior; Incluye deslizadores/rieles; Requiere reutilizar los rieles OEM; Soportes de montaje lateral; Rieles universales; Patrón de tornillos específico para el vehículo; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže sedeža: Spodnji pritrdilni nosilci; Vključuje drsnike/vodila; Zahteva ponovno uporabo vodil OEM; Stranski pritrdilni nosilci; Univerzalna vodila; Razporeditev vijakov, specifična za vozilo; Drugo
ja: シートマウントタイプ: ボトムマウントブラケット; スライダー/レール付き; OEMレールの再利用が必要; サイドマウントブラケット; ユニバーサルレール; 車種専用ボルトパターン; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže sjedala: Donji nosači; Uključuje klizače/vodilice; Zahtijeva ponovnu upotrebu OEM vodilica; Bočni nosači; Univerzalne vodilice; Raspored vijaka specifičan za vozilo; Ostalo
en: Seat mounting type: Bottom-mount brackets; Includes sliders/rails; Requires reuse of OEM rails; Side-mount brackets; Universal rails; Vehicle-specific bolt pattern; Other
tr: Koltuk montaj tipi: Alt montaj braketleri; Kaydırıcılar/raylar dahildir; OEM raylarının yeniden kullanımı gerekir; Yan montaj braketleri; Evrensel raylar; Araca özel civata düzeni; Diğer
de: Sitzmontageart: Bodenbefestigungswinkel; Inklusive Gleitschienen/Schienen; Erfordert Wiederverwendung von OEM-Schienen; Seitenbefestigungswinkel; Universalschienen; Fahrzeugspezifisches Schraubenmuster; Sonstige
pl: Typ mocowania fotela: Wsporniki montowane od spodu; Zawiera suwaki/szyny; Wymaga ponownego użycia szyn OEM; Wsporniki montowane z boku; Szyny uniwersalne; Rozstaw śrub dopasowany do pojazdu; Inny
fr: Type de fixation du siège: Supports de montage par le bas; Comprend des glissières/rails; Nécessite la réutilisation des rails OEM; Supports de montage latéral; Rails universels; Modèle de boulonnage spécifique au véhicule; Autre
zh-TW: 座椅安裝類型: 底部安裝支架; 包含滑軌/軌道; 需重複使用 OEM 軌道; 側邊安裝支架; 通用軌道; 車輛專用螺栓樣式; 其他
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งเบาะนั่ง: ขายึดติดตั้งด้านล่าง; รวมตัวเลื่อน/ราง; ต้องนำรางแบบ OEM กลับมาใช้ซ้ำ; ขายึดติดตั้งด้านข้าง; รางอเนกประสงค์; รูปแบบสลักเกลียวเฉพาะรุ่นรถ; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип крепления сиденья: Кронштейны нижнего крепления; Включает салазки/направляющие; Требуется повторное использование оригинальных направляющих OEM; Кронштейны бокового крепления; Универсальные направляющие; Схема отверстий под конкретный автомобиль; Другое
da: Monteringstype for sæde: Bundmonterede beslag; Inkluderer glideskinner; Kræver genbrug af OEM-skinner; Sidemonterede beslag; Universalskinner; Køretøjsspecifikt boltmønster; Andet
fi: Istuimen asennustyyppi: Pohjakiinnikkeet; Sisältää liukukiskot; Vaatii alkuperäiskiskojen uudelleenkäyttöä; Sivukiinnikkeet; Yleismalliset kiskot; Ajoneuvokohtainen pulttijako; Muu
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt ghế ngồi: Giá đỡ lắp dưới; Kèm theo thanh trượt/đường ray; Yêu cầu tái sử dụng đường ray OEM; Giá đỡ lắp hông; Đường ray đa năng; Mẫu bu-lông dành riêng cho xe; Khác
lt-LT: Sėdynės montavimo tipas: Apatinio tvirtinimo laikikliai; Pridedami slankikliai / bėgeliai; Reikalingas OEM bėgelių pakartotinis naudojimas; Šoninio tvirtinimo laikikliai; Universalūs bėgeliai; Transporto priemonei pritaikytas varžtų išdėstymas; Kita
nl: Type stoelmontage: Beugels voor bodemmontage; Inclusief schuif/rails; Vereist hergebruik van OEM-rails; Beugels voor zijmontage; Universele rails; Voertuigspecifiek boutpatroon; Overig
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на седалката: Скоби за долно монтиране; Включва плъзгачи/релси; Изисква повторно използване на OEM релсите; Скоби за странично монтиране; Универсални релси; Специфично за автомобила разположение на болтовете; Други
sv: Typ av montering för säte: Bottenmonterade fästen; Inkluderar glidskenor/skenor; Kräver återanvändning av OEM-skenor; Sidomonterade fästen; Universella skenor; Fordonsspecifikt bultmönster; Övrigt
zh-CN: 座椅安装类型: 底部安装支架; 包含滑块/导轨; 需要重复使用 OEM 导轨; 侧部安装支架; 通用导轨; 特定车型螺栓孔位; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de montare a scaunului: Suporturi de montare inferioare; Include glisiere/șine; Necesită reutilizarea șinelor OEM; Suporturi de montare laterale; Șine universale; Model de prindere specific vehiculului; Altele
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης καθίσματος: Στηρίγματα τοποθέτησης στο κάτω μέρος; Περιλαμβάνει ρυθμιστικά/ράγες; Απαιτείται επαναχρησιμοποίηση ραγών OEM; Στηρίγματα πλευρικής τοποθέτησης; Ράγες γενικής χρήσης; Σχέδιο βιδώματος ειδικό για το όχημα; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ pripevnenia sedadla: Konzoly na upevnenie zospodu; Zahŕňa posuvníky/koľajničky; Vyžaduje použitie pôvodných (OEM) koľajničiek; Konzoly na bočné upevnenie; Univerzálne koľajničky; Rozloženie skrutiek pre konkrétne vozidlo; Iné
it: Tipo di montaggio del sedile: Staffe a montaggio inferiore; Include guide/binari; Richiede il riutilizzo dei binari OEM; Staffe a montaggio laterale; Binari universali; Schema di bulloni specifico per il veicolo; Altro
hu: Ülés beszerelési típusa: Alsó rögzítőkonzolok; Csúszkákat/síneket tartalmaz; Az OEM sínek újrahasználata szükséges; Oldalsó rögzítőkonzolok; Univerzális sínek; Járműspecifikus csavarminta; Egyéb
cs: Typ uchycení sedadla: Spodní montážní držáky; Včetně pojezdů/kolejnic; Vyžaduje použití původních OEM kolejnic; Boční montážní držáky; Univerzální kolejnice; Rozteč šroubů specifická pro vozidlo; Jiné
ko: 시트 장착 유형: 바텀 마운트 브래킷; 슬라이더/레일 포함; OEM 레일 재사용 필요; 사이드 마운트 브래킷; 범용 레일; 차량 맞춤형 볼트 패턴; 기타
pt-BR: Assento, tipo de montagem: Suportes de montagem inferior; Inclui trilhos; Requer reutilização de trilhos OEM; Suportes de montagem lateral; Trilhos universais; Padrão de parafusos específico do veículo; Outros
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação do assento: Suportes de montagem inferior; Inclui calhas/trilhos; Requer reutilização das calhas OEM; Suportes de montagem lateral; Calhas universais; Padrão de parafusos específico para o veículo; Outro